Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2395.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 6183YH (3) 91 sb/js H.F. 2395 Section 1. Section 455B.172, Code 2026, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 2A. The department shall prohibit the 3 addition of hydrofluorosilicic acid or any other fluoride-based 4 additive in all public water supply systems. 5 Sec. 2. Section 455B.172, subsection 3, Code 2026, is 6 amended to read as follows: 7 3. a. Each county board of health shall adopt standards for 8 private water supplies and private sewage disposal facilities. 9 These standards shall be at least as stringent but consistent 10 with the standards adopted by the commission. If a county 11 board of health has not adopted standards for private water 12 supplies and private sewage disposal facilities, the standards 13 adopted by the commission shall be applied and enforced within 14 the county by the county board of health. 15 b. Each county board of health shall prohibit the addition 16 of hydrofluorosilicic acid or any other fluoride-based additive 17 in a private water supply. Standards adopted pursuant to 18 paragraph âaâ of this subsection shall not allow for an amount 19 of hydrofluorosilicic acid or any other fluoride-based compound 20 that is higher than ambient background levels. 21 Sec. 3. Section 455B.173, subsection 5, Code 2026, is 22 amended to read as follows: 23 5. Establish, modify, or repeal rules relating to 24 drinking water standards for public water supply systems. 25 Such standards shall specify maximum contaminant levels or 26 treatment techniques necessary to protect the public health and 27 welfare. Standards adopted pursuant to this subsection shall 28 not allow for an amount of hydrofluorosilicic acid or another 29 fluoride-based compound that is higher than ambient background 30 levels. The drinking water standards must assure compliance 31 with federal drinking water standards adopted pursuant to the 32 federal Safe Drinking Water Act. 33